Utah statutes.
17-50-311.   Courthouse, jail, hospital, and other public buildings --
Retainage.
(1) A county may erect, repair or rebuild, and furnish a courthouse, jail,
hospital, and such other public buildings as may be necessary, and join with
cities and towns in the construction, ownership, and operation of hospitals.
(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private contractor to erect, repair,
or rebuild public buildings under this section is retained or withheld, it
shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.
